Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-14,103.07
Filing of potential conflict of interest statement not required; when.

Individuals required to make disclosures pursuant to section 49-1499.04 or sections 49-14,103.01 to 49-14,103.06 shall not be required to file potential conflict of interest statements pursuant to section 49-1499.03.

Laws 1986, LB 548, § 8;

Laws 2001, LB 242, § 23.